Utah statutes.
17-34-4.   Contracts under Interlocal Cooperation Act.

This chapter may not be construed to prevent counties, cities, and towns from entering into contracts covering the furnishing by one to the other of all or any of the municipal services listed in Section 17-34-1 under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, except that where incorporated cities or towns perform one or more of the municipal services set forth in Section 17-34-1 for unincorporated areas of a county, payment shall be made from the special revenue fund.



Amended by Chapter 199, 2000 General Session

